Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-1002
Definitions.

As used in the Uniform Premarital Agreement Act:

(1) Premarital agreement means an agreement between prospective spouses made in contemplation of marriage and to be effective upon marriage.

(2) Property means an interest, present or future, legal or equitable, vested or contingent, in real or personal property, including income and earnings.

Laws 1994, LB 202, § 2.

The parties' premarital agreement providing that each party would retain "full and complete ownership of all real and personal property that they now own" and "full and complete ownership of all property which shall come into their possession as the result of each party's work and labor, investments, inheritance or otherwise" was enforceable. Cook v. Cook, 26 Neb. App. 137, 918 N.W.2d 1 (2018).